Utah statutes.
63J-5-103.   Scope and applicability of chapter.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), and except as otherwise provided by a statute superseding provisions of this chapter by explicit reference to this chapter, the provisions of this chapter apply to each agency and govern each federal funds request.

(2)  This chapter does not govern federal funds requests for:

(a)  the Medical Assistance Program, commonly known as Medicaid;

(b)  the Children's Health Insurance Program;

(c)  the Women, Infant, and Children program;

(d)  the Temporary Assistance to Needy Families program;

(e)  Social Security Act money;

(f)  the Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment program;

(g)  Child Care Block grants;

(h) SNAP Administration and Training money;

(i)  Unemployment Insurance Operations money;

(j)  Federal Highway Administration money;

(k)  the Utah National Guard; or

(l)  pass-through federal funds.

(3)  The governor need not seek legislative review or approval of federal funds received by the state if:

(a)  the governor has declared a state of emergency; and

(b)  the federal funds are received to assist victims of the state of emergency under Subsection 63K-4-201(1).

